Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.0554

Five-member commission—Newly created positions—Terms of initially elected commissioners.

The terms of the persons who are initially elected to positions four and five under RCW 36.32.0552 shall be as follows:

(1) If the year in which the primary and general elections are held is an even-numbered year, the person elected to position four shall be elected for a two-year term, and the person elected to position five shall be elected for a four-year term; or

(2) If the year in which the primary and general elections are held is an odd-numbered year, the person elected to position four shall be elected for a one-year term, and the person elected to position five shall be elected for a three-year term.

The length of the terms shall be calculated from the first day of January in the year following the election. Each person elected pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall take office immediately upon the issuance of a certificate of his or her election.

Thereafter, persons elected to commissioner positions four and five shall be elected for four-year terms and shall take office at the same time the other members of the board of county commissioners take office.

[ 1990 c 252 s 4.]